Tennessee, session 114, SB1823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-4-703, is amended by deleting the
language "forty-five (45) days" and substituting "thirty (30) days".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 12-4-704, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c)
(1) Not later than January 10, 2027, and each January 10 thereafter,
each agency that makes payments to a business under a contract pursuant to §
12-4-703 shall report for the immediately preceding calendar year:
(A) The number of late payments made and that remain
outstanding and the aggregate amount of such payments; and
(B) The amount of interest paid on such late payments and that
remains unpaid on outstanding late payments.
(2) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c)(1) must be submitted
to the chair of the state and local government committee of the senate and to the
chair of the committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over
public contracts.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1823
010535
- 1 -